Ohio, session 136, SB411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.511 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.511. The twentieth day of July is designated as "Neil Armstrong Day" in recognition of Neil Armstrong first setting foot on the moon on that day in 1969.